Vermont, session 2025-2026, S218.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this act to establish the accepted standards of care for
the application of salt and salt alternatives in an effective and efficient manner
that provides safe conditions for pedestrians and motor vehicles on traveled
surfaces while also reducing the impacts of salt and salt alternatives on the
quality of the waters of the State.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3B is added to read:
Subchapter 3B. Chloride Contamination Reduction Program
§ 1361. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Apply salt” or “application of salt” means to apply salt or a salt
alternative to roadways, parking lots, or sidewalks for the purpose of winter
maintenance or for summer dust control. “Apply salt” or “application of salt”

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 3 of 13
does not mean the application of salt to a transportation infrastructure
construction project.
(2) “Commercial salt applicator” means any individual who for
compensation applies salt or salt alternatives, but does not include municipal
or State employees.
(3) “Master commercial salt applicator” means any individual who
employs and is responsible for individuals who for compensation apply salt or
salt alternatives, but does not include municipal or State employees.
(4) “Salt” means sodium chloride, calcium chloride, magnesium
chloride, or any other substance containing chloride used for the purpose of
deicing, anti-icing, or dust control.
(5) “Salt alternative” means any substance not containing chloride used
for the purpose of deicing, anti-icing, or dust control.
(6) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(7) “Transportation infrastructure construction project” means a project
that involves the construction of roadways, parking lots, or sidewalks or other
construction activities at transportation facilities or within transportation
rights-of-way.
§ 1362. CHLORIDE CONTAMINATION REDUCTION PROGRAM
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources, after consultation with the
Secretary of Transportation and other states with similar chloride

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 4 of 13
contamination reduction programs, shall establish the Chloride Contamination
Reduction Program for the voluntary education, training, and certification of
commercial salt applicators regarding the effective and efficient application of
salt and salt alternatives to provide safe conditions for pedestrians and motor
vehicles on traveled surfaces while also reducing the impacts of salt and salt
alternatives on the quality of the waters of the State.
(b) As part of the Program, the Secretary of Natural Resources, on or
before July 1, 2027, shall adopt by rule best management practices for the
application of salt or salt alternatives by commercial salt applicators. The best
management practices may be based on practices currently implemented by the
Agency of Transportation or other entities. The best management practices
shall:
(1) establish measures or techniques to increase efficiency in the
application of salt or salt alternatives so that the least amount of salt or salt
alternatives is used while maintaining safe conditions for pedestrians and
motor vehicles on traveled surfaces;
(2) establish standards for when and how salt and salt alternatives are
applied in order to prevent salt or salt alternatives from entering the waters of
the State, including:

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 5 of 13
(A) salt alternatives that are cost-effective and less harmful to water
quality while maintaining safe conditions for pedestrians and motor vehicles
on traveled surfaces;
(B) whether and how to implement equipment to calibrate, monitor,
or meter the application of salt or salt alternatives; and
(C) when sand is an appropriate alternative to salt or salt alternatives
for deicing or dust control, particularly in regard to when the application of
sand will be less harmful to water quality;
(3) establish record-keeping requirements for commercial salt
applicators, including records of training and records describing the type and
rate of application of salt or salt alternatives, the dates of use, weather
conditions requiring the use of salt or salt alternatives, and any other factors
that the Secretary of Natural Resources deems necessary for the purposes of
the Program;
(4) create and circulate a model form for the record-keeping information
required under this section;
(5) establish requirements for certification under this subchapter,
including frequency of training and manner of training;
(6) establish a testing requirement for applicators to complete prior to
receiving an initial certification under the Program; and

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 6 of 13
(7) establish other requirements deemed necessary by the Secretary to
achieve the purposes of the Program.
(c)(1) The Program shall offer training for commercial applicators in the
implementation of the best management practices required under subsection
(b) of this section. Upon completion of training, a commercial salt applicator
shall be designated a certified commercial salt applicator. The term of a
commercial salt applicator certification issued under the Program shall be for
two years from the date of issuance of the certification.
(2) A business that employs multiple commercial salt applicators may
apply to the Secretary for the certification of the business owner or other
designated employee as a master commercial salt applicator. A certified
master commercial salt applicator shall ensure that all persons employed by the
business to apply salt or salt alternatives are trained to comply with the best
management practices established under subsection (b) of this section.
(d)(1) A certified commercial salt applicator shall submit an annual
summary of total winter salt usage to the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(2) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall establish methods to
estimate and track the amount of salt applied by certified commercial salt
applicators.
(e) The Secretary may revoke a certification issued under this subchapter
after notice and opportunity for a hearing for a violation of the requirements of

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 7 of 13
this subchapter, the rules of this subchapter, or the provisions of a certification
issued under this subchapter.
(f)(1) The Program shall include requirements for the certification of a
master commercial salt applicator.
(2) The Program shall specifically exclude salt applications related to
transportation infrastructure construction projects.
(3) The Secretary may elect to implement the Program with State
agency staff or through a third-party vendor, or some combination.
§ 1363. AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE; SALT APPLICATION
(a) A certified commercial salt applicator or an owner, occupant, or lessee
of real property maintained by a certified commercial salt applicator shall have
an affirmative defense against a claim for damages resulting from a hazard
caused by snow or ice if:
(1) the claimed damages were caused solely by snow or ice; and
(2) any failure or delay in removing or mitigating the hazard is the
result of the certified commercial salt applicator’s implementation of the best
management practices established under section 1362 of this title for the
application of salt or salt alternatives.
(b) The affirmative defense provided under subsection (a) of this section
shall not apply when the civil damages are due to gross negligence or reckless
disregard of the hazard.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 8 of 13
(c) The affirmative defense provided under subsection (a) of this section is
not exclusive and is in addition to any other defenses or immunities provided
under State law.
(d) In order to assert the affirmative defense provided under subsection (a)
of this section, a certified commercial salt applicator or an owner, occupant, or
lessee of real property maintained by a certified commercial salt applicator
shall keep a record describing its road, parking lot, and property maintenance
practices, consistent with the requirements determined by the Secretary under
this subchapter. The record shall include the type and rate of application of
salt and salt alternatives used, the dates of treatment, and the weather
conditions for each event requiring deicing. Such records shall be retained by
the applicator for a period of three years.
§ 1364. ENFORCEMENT; PRESUMPTION OF COMPLIANCE; WATER
QUALITY
(a) A certified commercial salt applicator or a commercial salt applicator
employed by a certified master commercial salt applicator is entitled to a
rebuttable presumption that the certified commercial salt applicator or
commercial salt applicator is in compliance with the requirements of sections
1263 and 1264 of this title when applying salt or salt alternatives according to
the best management practices established under section 1362 of this title. The
rebuttable presumption under this subsection shall not apply to the

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 9 of 13
requirements of a total maximum daily load plan required under this chapter or
the requirements of a municipal separate storm sewer system permit required
under section 1264 of this title.
(b) The Secretary may revoke a certification issued under this subchapter
after notice and opportunity for a hearing for a violation of the requirements of
this subchapter, the rules of this subchapter, or the provisions of a certification
issued under this subchapter.
§ 1365. EDUCATION AND OUTREACH
The Secretary of Natural Resources, through the staff of the Chloride
Contamination Reduction Program, shall conduct education and outreach to
inform:
(1) commercial salt applicators of the existence of the Chloride
Contamination Reduction Program and the training and affirmative defense
offered under the Program; and
(2) members of the public who purchase salt or salt alternatives for use
on driveways, sidewalks, private roads, and other paved surfaces of the
potential harm to water quality, pets, and wildlife from the excessive
application of salt and salt alternatives and how to decrease the potential harm.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 10 of 13
Sec. 3. ANR REPORT ON MANAGEMENT OF SALT AND SAND
STORAGE FACILITIES
On or before January 15, 2027, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
submit to the House Committees on Environment and on Transportation and
the Senate Committees on Natural Resources and Energy and on
Transportation a report regarding the management of State and municipal
facilities (facilities) for the storage of salt, salt and sand mixtures, salt
alternatives, and sand that is not mixed with salt. The report shall include:
(1) an inventory of facilities in the State used for the storage of salt, salt
and sand mixtures, salt alternatives, or sand that is not mixed with salt;
(2) an estimate of the number of facilities that are currently covered;
(3) an estimate of the number of facilities that are not covered and are
within 100 yards of a surface water or drinking water source;
(4) an estimate of the number of facilities that are not covered and are
more than 100 yards from a surface water or drinking water source; and
(5) an estimate of the total cost to cover or move facilities for the
storage of salt, salt and sand mixtures, salt alternatives, or sand that is not
mixed with salt, including a proposed annual amount of funding that would be
required to meet the timelines for covering or movement including an estimate
of the time necessary to cover or move all facilities requiring cover or
movement and an estimated annual amount of funding that would be needed
for cover or movement.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 11 of 13
Sec. 4. MUNICIPALSALT APPLICATORS; VERMONT LOCALROADS
CURRICULUM; AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE
(a)(1) On or before November 1, 2027, the Secretary of Natural Resources,
in collaboration with the Secretary of Transportation, shall identify and make
the changes to the Vermont Local Roads curriculum needed to support
municipal salt applicators in meeting the purpose of this act, including training
on best management practices for spreading salt or salt alternatives on roads,
parking lots, and sidewalks.
(2) As used in this section, “municipal salt applicator” means any
individual who applies or supervises others who apply salt or salt alternatives
in the applicator’s capacity as an employee or agent of a town or a
municipality, but does not include State employees.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of 24 V.S.A. § 901a to the contrary, a
municipal employee shall have an affirmative defense against a claim for
damages resulting from a hazard caused by snow or ice if:
(1) the municipal salt applicator completed the Vermont Local Roads
curriculum providing best management practices for spreading salt or salt
alternatives on roads, parking lots, and sidewalks in that calendar year;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 12 of 13
(2) the claimed damages were caused solely by snow or ice; and
(3) any failure or delay in removing or mitigating the hazard is the
result of the municipal salt applicator’s implementation of the best
management practices learned under the Vermont Local Roads curriculum.
(c) The affirmative defense provided under subsection (b) of this section
shall not apply when the civil damages are due to gross negligence or reckless
disregard of the hazard.
(d) The affirmative defense provided under subsection (b) of this section is
not exclusive and is in addition to any other defenses or immunities provided
under State law.
(e) In order to assert the affirmative defense provided under subsection (b)
of this section, a municipality shall keep a record describing its road, parking
lot, and property maintenance practices, consistent with the requirements
determined by the Secretary under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3B. The
record shall include the type and rate of application of salt and salt alternatives
used, the dates of treatment, and the weather conditions for each event
requiring deicing. Such records shall be retained by the applicator for a period
of three years.
Sec. 5. FEE REPORT
On or before January 15, 2027, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
solicit interest from third-party vendors for training and certifying commercial
salt applicators under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3B. The Secretary
shall recommend to the House Committees on Environment and on Ways and

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.218
2026 Page 13 of 13
Means and the Senate Committees on Natural Resources and Energy and on
Finance a fee to be charged either by the State or by a third-party vendor for
the certification of commercial salt applicators under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47,
subchapter 3B. Any fee charged to commercial salt applicators by the State or
a third-party vendor for certification under the Chloride Contamination
Reduction Program shall be approved by the General Assembly. The Secretary
of Natural Resources, after consultation with the Secretary of Transportation,
shall recommend to the House Committees on Environment and on Ways and
Means and the Senate Committees on Natural Resources and Energy and on
Finance a fee to be charged either by the State or by a third-party vendor for
the certification of commercial salt applicators under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47,
subchapter 3B and a fee to be charged to municipal salt applicators
completing the salt applicator training set forth under Sec. 4 of this act. Any
fee charged to commercial salt applicators or municipal salt applicators by the
State or a third-party vendor for certification under the Chloride
Contamination Reduction Program or under the Vermont Local Roads
curriculum shall be approved by the General Assembly.
Sec. 6. CONTINGENT IMPLEMENTATION; FUNDING
The duty of the Agency of Natural Resources to implement Secs. 2
(Chloride Contamination Reduction Program), 4 (municipal salt applicators),
and 5 (fee report) of this act is contingent upon an appropriation from the
General Fund for the specific purposes described in Secs. 2, 4, and 5 of this
act.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.